nl: Batterijconfiguratie: AK-stick; Blok; Brick; Butterfly; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Split; Stick; Overig
de: Akkukonfiguration: AK Stick; Block; Brick; Butterfly; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Split; Stick; Sonstige
tr: Batarya tipi: AK çubuk; Blok; Tuğla; Kelebek; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Bölünmüş; Çubuk; Diğer
es: Configuración de la batería: Bastón para AK; Bloque; Ladrillo; Mariposa; Grulla; Nunchaku; PEQ; Separada; Bastón; Otro
fr: Configuration de la batterie: AK stick; Bloc; Brique; Papillon; Crane; Nunchaku; PEQ; En deux parties; Bâton; Autre
zh-CN: 电池配置: AK 条形; 块状; 砖形; 蝴蝶形; Crane; 双截棍形; PEQ; 分体式; 条形; 其他
sl-SI: Konfiguracija baterije: Palica AK; Blok; Opeka; Metulj; Kopito (Crane); Nunčaki; PEQ; Deljena; Palica; Drugo
pl: Konfiguracja baterii: Typ AK; Blok; Cegła; Motylek; Typ Crane; Typ Nunchaku; Typ PEQ; Dzielona; Typ Stick; Inne
pt-PT: Configuração da bateria: Bastão AK; Bloco; Tijolo; Borboleta; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Dividida; Bastão; Outro
el: Διαμόρφωση μπαταρίας: Μπαταρία AK (stick); Μπλοκ; Τούβλο (brick); Πεταλούδα (butterfly); Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Split; Stick; Άλλο
pt-BR: Configuração da bateria: Stick AK; Bloco; Tijolo; Borboleta; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Split; Stick; Outro
ro-RO: Configurația bateriei: Stick AK; Bloc; Cărămidă; Fluture; Crane; Nunchaku; PEQ; Split; Stick; Altele
da: Konfiguration af batteri: AK stick; Blok; Brick; Butterfly; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Delt; Stick; Andet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на батерията: AK stick; Блок; Тухла; Пеперуда; Кран; Нунчаку; PEQ; Разделена; Стик; Друго
sk-SK: Konfigurácia batérie: AK stick; Blok; Tehla; Motýlik; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Rozdelené; Stick; Iné
it: Configurazione della batteria: AK stick; A blocco; A mattoncino; A farfalla; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Split; Stick; Altro
ko: 배터리 구성: AK 스틱; 블록; 브릭; 버터플라이; 크레인; 눈차크; PEQ; 스플릿; 스틱; 기타
lt-LT: Baterijos konfigūracija: AK lazdelė; Blokas; Plyta; Drugelis; „Crane“; Nunčiakai; PEQ; Padalinta; Lazdelė; Kita
ru: Конфигурация батареи: АК-тип (колбаса); Блок; Кирпич; Бабочка; Нунчаки (Crane); Нунчаки; PEQ; Раздельная; Стик; Другая
vi: Cấu hình pin: Thanh dài AK; Khối; Gạch; Cánh bướm; Pin kiểu crane; Khúc côn nhị; Khối PEQ; Phân tách; Thanh; Khác
cs: Provedení baterie: AK stick; Blok; Cihla; Motýlek; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Dělená; Tyčová; Jiné
hr-HR: Konfiguracija baterije: AK štapić; Blok; Cigla; Leptir; Crane; Nunchaku; PEQ; Odvojeno; Štapić; Ostalo
th: การกำหนดค่าแบตเตอรี่: แท่ง AK; บล็อก; ก้อนบริค; ผีเสื้อ; เครน; กระบองสองท่อน; PEQ; แยกส่วน; แท่ง; อื่นๆ
nb: Batterikonfigurasjon: AK-stav; Blokk; Kloss; Sommerfugl; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Delt; Stav; Annet
hu: Akkumulátor konfiguráció: AK rúd; Blokk; Tégla; Pillangó; Crane; Nunchaku; PEQ; Osztott; Rúd; Egyéb
en: Battery configuration: AK stick; Block; Brick; Butterfly; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Split; Stick; Other
ja: バッテリー構造: AK スティック; ブロック; ブリック; バタフライ; クレーン; ヌンチャク; PEQ; スプリット; スティック; その他
sv: Batterikonfiguration: AK-stav; Block; Kloss; Butterfly; Crane; Nunchuck; PEQ; Delad; Stav; Övrigt
zh-TW: 電池配置: AK 條型; 塊狀; 磚型; 蝴蝶型; Crane 型; 雙節棍型; PEQ 型; 分離式; 條型; 其他
fi: Pariston konfiguraatio: AK-tikku; Lohko; Tiili; Perhonen; Crane; Nunchaku; PEQ; Jaettu; Tikku; Muu